District of Columbia statutes.
42-3671.13

Limitation of actions.

A civil action under this chapter may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction within the later of one year after the date of the occurrence of any violation or 6 months after the lease-purchase agreement, together with any renewals or extensions thereof, ceases to be in effect. Notwithstanding the above, a civil action may be maintained by way of recoupment or counterclaim in an action brought against the consumer by the lessor or its assignee.

History

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-99, § 14, 49 DCR 1000